Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 7.2 The Education Equity and Property Tax Relief Act

16-7.2-1.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly recognizes the need for an equitable distribution of resources among the state’s school districts, property tax relief and a predicable method of distributing education aid. The general assembly finds that there is a need to reform the way public education is financed because:

All children should have access to an adequate and meaningful education regardless of their residence or economic means;

A school funding system should treat property taxpayers equably, limit the portion of school budgets financed by property taxes, and establish sufficient cost controls on school spending;

The state should ensure that its school funding structure adequately reflects the different needs of students, and closes the educational inequities among the state’s school districts; and

The state education funding system should provide a predicable amount and source of funding to ensure stability in the funding of schools.

The intent of this chapter is to promote a school finance system in Rhode Island that is predicated on student need and taxpayer ability to pay. A new school funding system in the state should promote educational equity for all students and reduce the reliance on the property tax to fund public education. This legislation is intended to ensure educational opportunity to each pupil in each city or town on substantially equal terms. Adequate per pupil support will be provided through a combination of state school aid and local education property tax levies.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 393, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 491, § 1.

16-7.2-2.
Joint legislative committee to establish a permanent education foundation aid formula for Rhode Island.

There is hereby established a joint legislative committee to develop a basic foundation support program and an appropriate transition plan to fully implement a new funding system.

The committee shall consist of ten (10) members, five (5) of which shall be appointed by the speaker of the house, one (1) of which shall be from the minority party, and five (5) members appointed by the president of the senate, one (1) of which shall be from the minority party. The speaker of the house and president of the senate shall each appoint a committee co-chair.

The joint legislative committee is directed to consider the following framework in developing a new education foundation support program:

A state education funding formula that is student population and needs driven. Student counts should include enrollments, students eligible for free and reduced lunch, those participating in language assistance programs, and special education. Provisions should be made for those school districts that experience declining enrollments.

The accounting for “extraordinary special education expenditures” in special education spending for one child in a given fiscal year.

A per pupil foundation amount to be used in the calculation of school funding. The per pupil foundation amount should be based on what the cost is to provide an equitable and adequate education, and consider various cost factors, such as pupil-teacher ratios, teacher and staff compensation, technology investments, educational supplies, teacher training and professional development, student performance assessments, curriculum offerings and support services and other costs associated with the delivery of educational services.

Per pupil cost, based on a least cost option plan to provide purchase of service contracts in areas such as equipment, repair, benefits, transportation, general purchasing, capital construction, data processing and health and other insurance programs. In addition, the department of education should assist regional collaboratives in identifying opportunities to maximize multiple school district participation for “high cost” programs.

Various methods of funding the system.

A transition education funding plan.

The speaker of the house and president of the senate, in consultation with the committee co-chairs, are hereby directed to appoint a foundation aid technical advisory group, and a property tax relief technical advisory group.

The foundation aid technical advisory group shall advise and assist the committee in recommending foundation aid amounts by:

Identifying specific resources and least cost options to provide every child the opportunity to necessary educational opportunities to meet education performance standards; and

Systematically calculating the amount of per pupil funding necessary to support an effective and efficient educational system. The group may create task forces to consider the needs of special populations, comprehensive education programs, and noneducational support activities, composed of experts in these areas. In developing a foundation aid amount, the group shall consider, among other factors, pupil-teacher ratios, compensation, collective bargaining practices, technology investments, educational supplies, teacher training and professional development, student performance assessments, curriculum offerings and support services and all other costs and needs associated with the delivery of educational services.

The property tax relief technical advisory group shall advise and assist the committee in identifying the options and the impact of replacing existing local education property tax levies that support the funding of elementary and secondary education with other resources.

The joint committee shall issue a report outlining its findings and recommendations no later than May 15, 2007.

All state agencies and departments shall be directed to cooperate with and provide all necessary information to the joint legislative committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 393, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 491, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 267, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 10, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 12, § 1.

16-7.2-3.
Permanent foundation education aid established.

Beginning in the 2012 fiscal year, the following foundation education-aid formula shall take effect. The foundation education aid for each district shall be the sum of the core instruction amount in subdivision (a)(1) and the amount to support high-need students in subdivision (a)(2), which shall be multiplied by the district state-share ratio calculated pursuant to §

16-7.2-4

to determine the foundation aid.

The core-instruction amount shall be an amount equal to a statewide, per-pupil core-instruction amount as established by the department of elementary and secondary education, derived from the average of northeast regional expenditure data for the states of Rhode Island, Massachusetts, Connecticut, and New Hampshire from the National Center for Education Statistics (NCES) that will adequately fund the student instructional needs as described in the basic education program and multiplied by the district average daily membership as defined in §

16-7-22

. Expenditure data in the following categories: instruction and support services for students, instruction, general administration, school administration, and other support services from the National Public Education Financial Survey, as published by NCES, and enrollment data from the Common Core of Data, also published by NCES, will be used when determining the core-instruction amount. The core-instruction amount will be updated annually. For the purpose of calculating this formula, school districts’ resident average daily membership shall exclude charter school and state-operated school students.

The amount to support high-need students beyond the core-instruction amount shall be determined by multiplying a student success factor of forty percent (40%) by the core instruction per-pupil amount described in subdivision (a)(1) and applying that amount for each resident child whose family income is at or below one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of federal poverty guidelines, hereinafter referred to as “poverty status.” By October 1, 2022, as part of its budget submission pursuant to §

35-3-4

relative to state fiscal year 2024 and thereafter, the department of elementary and secondary education shall develop and utilize a poverty measure that in the department’s assessment most accurately serves as a proxy for the poverty status referenced in this subsection and does not rely on the administration of school nutrition programs. The department shall utilize this measure in calculations pursuant to this subsection related to the application of the student success factor, in calculations pursuant to §

16-7.2-4

related to the calculation of the state share ratio, and in the formulation of estimates pursuant to subsection (b) below. The department may also include any recommendations which seek to mitigate any disruptions associated with the implementation of this new poverty measure or improve the accuracy of its calculation.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall provide an estimate of the foundation education aid cost as part of its budget submission pursuant to §

35-3-4

. The estimate shall include the most recent data available as well as an adjustment for average daily membership growth or decline based on the prior year experience.

In addition, the department shall report updated figures based on the average daily membership as of October 1 by December 1.

Local education agencies may set aside a portion of funds received under subsection (a) to expand learning opportunities such as after school and summer programs, full-day kindergarten and/or multiple pathway programs, provided that the basic education program and all other approved programs required in law are funded.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate such regulations as are necessary to implement fully the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 11, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 10, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

16-7.2-4.
Determination of state’s share.

For each district, the state’s share of the foundation education aid calculated pursuant to §

16-7.2-3(a)

shall use a calculation that considers a district’s revenue-generating capacity and concentration of high-need students. The calculation is the square root of the sum of the state-share ratio for the community calculation, pursuant to §

16-7-20

, squared plus the district’s percentage of students in grades PK-6 in poverty status squared, divided by two.

For purposes of determining the state’s share, school district student data used in this calculation shall include charter school and state school students. These ratios are used in the permanent foundation education aid formula calculation described in §

16-7.2-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 4; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 23; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 11, § 2.

16-7.2-5.
Charter public schools, the William M. Davies, Jr. Career and Technical High School, and the Metropolitan Regional Career and Technical Center.

Charter public schools, as defined in chapter 77 of this title, the William M. Davies, Jr. Career and Technical High School (Davies), and the Metropolitan Regional Career and Technical Center (the Met Center) shall be funded pursuant to §

16-7.2-3

. If the October 1 actual enrollment data for any charter public school shows a ten percent (10%) or greater change from the prior year enrollment that is used as the reference year average daily membership, the last six (6) monthly payments to the charter public school will be adjusted to reflect actual enrollment. The state share of the permanent foundation education aid shall be paid by the state directly to the charter public schools, Davies, and the Met Center pursuant to §

16-7.2-9

and shall be calculated using the state-share ratio of the district of residence of the student as set forth in §

16-7.2-4

. The department of elementary and secondary education shall provide the general assembly with the calculation of the state share of permanent foundation education aid for charter public schools delineated by school district.

The local share of education funding shall be paid to the charter public school, Davies, and the Met Center by the district of residence of the student and shall be the local, per-pupil cost calculated by dividing the local appropriation to education from property taxes, net of debt service, and capital projects, as defined in the uniform chart of accounts by the average daily membership for each city and town, pursuant to §

16-7-22

, for the reference year.

Beginning in FY 2017, there shall be a reduction to the local per-pupil funding paid by the district of residence to charter public schools, Davies, and the Met Center. This reduction shall be equal to the greater (i) Of seven percent (7%) of the local, per-pupil funding of the district of residence pursuant to subsection (b) or (ii) The per-pupil value of the district’s costs for non-public textbooks, transportation for non-public students, retiree health benefits, out-of-district special-education tuition and transportation, services for students age eighteen (18) to twenty-one (21) years old, pre-school screening and intervention, and career and technical education, tuition and transportation costs, debt service and rental costs minus the average expenses incurred by charter schools for those same categories of expenses as reported in the uniform chart of accounts for the prior preceding fiscal year pursuant to §

16-7-16(11)

and verified by the department of elementary and secondary education. In the case where audited financials result in a change in the calculation after the first tuition payment is made, the remaining payments shall be based on the most recent audited data. For those districts whose greater reduction occurs under the calculation of (ii), there shall be an additional reduction to payments to mayoral academies with teachers who do not participate in the state teacher’s retirement system under chapter 8 of title 36 equal to the per-pupil value of teacher retirement costs attributable to unfunded liability as calculated by the state’s actuary for the prior preceding fiscal year.

Local district payments to charter public schools, Davies, and the Met Center for each district’s students enrolled in these schools shall be made on a quarterly basis in July, October, January, and April; however, the first local-district payment shall be made by August 15, instead of July. Failure of the community to make the local-district payment for its student(s) enrolled in a charter public school, Davies, and/or the Met Center may result in the withholding of state education aid pursuant to §

16-7-31

.

Beginning in FY 2017, school districts with charter public school, Davies, and the Met Center enrollment, that, combined, comprise five percent (5%) or more of the average daily membership as defined in §

16-7-22

, shall receive additional aid for a period of three (3) years. Aid in FY 2017 shall be equal to the number of charter public school, open-enrollment schools, Davies, or the Met Center students as of the reference year as defined in §

16-7-16

times a per-pupil amount of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175). Aid in FY 2018 shall be equal to the number of charter public school, open-enrollment schools, Davies, or the Met Center students as of the reference year as defined in §

16-7-16

times a per-pupil amount of one hundred dollars ($100). Aid in FY 2019 shall be equal to the number of charter public school, open-enrollment schools, Davies, or the Met Center students as of the reference year as defined in § 16-7-16 times a per-pupil amount of fifty dollars ($50.00). The additional aid shall be used to offset the adjusted fixed costs retained by the districts of residence.

School districts with charter public school, Davies, and the Met Center enrollment, that, combined, comprise five percent (5%) or more of the average daily membership as defined in §

16-7-22

, shall receive additional aid intended to help offset the impact of new and expanding charter schools. For FY 2022, aid shall be equal to the number of new students being served as determined by the difference between the reference year as defined in §

16-7-16

and FY 2019 times a per-pupil amount of five hundred dollars ($500). For FY 2023 and thereafter, aid shall be equal to the number of new students being served as determined by the difference between the reference year as defined in §

16-7-16

and the prior reference year times a per-pupil amount of five hundred dollars ($500). The additional aid shall be used to offset the adjusted fixed costs retained by the districts of residence.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 489, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 11, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 7; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 10, § 2, effective July 6, 2021.

16-7.2-6.
Categorical programs, state funded expenses.

In addition to the foundation education aid provided pursuant to §

16-7.2-3

, the permanent foundation education-aid program shall provide direct state funding for:

Excess costs associated with special education students. Excess costs are defined when an individual special education student’s cost shall be deemed to be “extraordinary.” Extraordinary costs are those educational costs that exceed the state-approved threshold based on an amount above five times the core foundation amount (total of core-instruction amount plus student success amount). The department of elementary and secondary education shall prorate the funds available for distribution among those eligible school districts if the total approved costs for which school districts are seeking reimbursement exceed the amount of funding appropriated in any fiscal year; and the department of elementary and secondary education shall also collect data on those educational costs that exceed the state-approved threshold based on an amount above two (2), three (3), and four (4) times the core-foundation amount;

Career and technical education costs to help meet initial investment requirements needed to transform existing, or create new, comprehensive, career and technical education programs and career pathways in critical and emerging industries and to help offset the higher-than-average costs associated with facilities, equipment maintenance and repair, and supplies necessary for maintaining the quality of highly specialized programs that are a priority for the state. The department shall develop criteria for the purpose of allocating any and all career and technical education funds as may be determined by the general assembly on an annual basis. The department of elementary and secondary education shall prorate the funds available for distribution among those eligible school districts if the total approved costs for which school districts are seeking reimbursement exceed the amount of funding available in any fiscal year;

Programs to increase access to voluntary, free, high-quality pre-kindergarten programs. The department shall recommend criteria for the purpose of allocating any and all early childhood program funds as may be determined by the general assembly;

Central Falls, Davies, and the Met Center Stabilization Fund is established to ensure that appropriate funding is available to support their students. Additional support for Central Falls is needed due to concerns regarding the city’s capacity to meet the local share of education costs. This fund requires that education aid calculated pursuant to §

16-7.2-3

and funding for costs outside the permanent foundation education-aid formula, including, but not limited to, transportation, facility maintenance, and retiree health benefits shall be shared between the state and the city of Central Falls. The fund shall be annually reviewed to determine the amount of the state and city appropriation. The state’s share of this fund may be supported through a reallocation of current state appropriations to the Central Falls school district. At the end of the transition period defined in §

16-7.2-7

, the municipality will continue its contribution pursuant to §

16-7-24

. Additional support for the Davies and the Met Center is needed due to the costs associated with running a stand-alone high school offering both academic and career and technical coursework. The department shall recommend criteria for the purpose of allocating any and all stabilization funds as may be determined by the general assembly;

Excess costs associated with transporting students to out-of-district non-public schools. This fund will provide state funding for the costs associated with transporting students to out-of-district non-public schools, pursuant to chapter 21.1 of this title. The state will assume the costs of non-public out-of-district transportation for those districts participating in the statewide system. The department of elementary and secondary education shall prorate the funds available for distribution among those eligible school districts if the total approved costs for which school districts are seeking reimbursement exceed the amount of funding available in any fiscal year;

Excess costs associated with transporting students within regional school districts. This fund will provide direct state funding for the excess costs associated with transporting students within regional school districts, established pursuant to chapter 3 of this title. This fund requires that the state and regional school district share equally the student transportation costs net any federal sources of revenue for these expenditures. The department of elementary and secondary education shall prorate the funds available for distribution among those eligible school districts if the total approved costs for which school districts are seeking reimbursement exceed the amount of funding available in any fiscal year;

Public school districts that are regionalized shall be eligible for a regionalization bonus as set forth below:

As used herein, the term “regionalized” shall be deemed to refer to a regional school district established under the provisions of chapter 3 of this title, including the Chariho Regional School district;

For those districts that are regionalized as of July 1, 2010, the regionalization bonus shall commence in FY 2012. For those districts that regionalize after July 1, 2010, the regionalization bonus shall commence in the first fiscal year following the establishment of a regionalized school district as set forth in chapter 3 of this title, including the Chariho Regional School District;

The regionalization bonus in the first fiscal year shall be two percent (2.0%) of the state’s share of the foundation education aid for the regionalized district as calculated pursuant to §§

16-7.2-3

and

16-7.2-4

in that fiscal year;

The regionalization bonus in the second fiscal year shall be one percent (1.0%) of the state’s share of the foundation education aid for the regionalized district as calculated pursuant to §§

16-7.2-3

and

16-7.2-4

in that fiscal year;

The regionalization bonus shall cease in the third fiscal year;

The regionalization bonus for the Chariho regional school district shall be applied to the state share of the permanent foundation education aid for the member towns; and

The department of elementary and secondary education shall prorate the funds available for distribution among those eligible regionalized school districts if the total, approved costs for which regionalized school districts are seeking a regionalization bonus exceed the amount of funding appropriated in any fiscal year;

Additional state support for English learners (EL). The amount to support EL students shall be determined by multiplying an EL factor of ten percent (10%) by the core-instruction per-pupil amount defined in §

16-7.2-3(a)(1)

and applying that amount of additional state support to EL students identified using widely adopted, independent standards and assessments identified by the commissioner. All categorical funds distributed pursuant to this subsection must be used to provide high-quality, research-based services to EL students and managed in accordance with requirements set forth by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The department of elementary and secondary education shall collect performance reports from districts and approve the use of funds prior to expenditure. The department of elementary and secondary education shall ensure the funds are aligned to activities that are innovative and expansive and not utilized for activities the district is currently funding. The department of elementary and secondary education shall prorate the funds available for distribution among eligible recipients if the total calculated costs exceed the amount of funding available in any fiscal year;

State support for school resource officers. For purposes of this subsection, a school resource officer (SRO) shall be defined as a career law enforcement officer with sworn authority who is deployed by an employing police department or agency in a community-oriented policing assignment to work in collaboration with one or more schools. School resource officers should have completed at least forty (40) hours of specialized training in school policing, administered by an accredited agency, before being assigned. Beginning in FY 2019, for a period of three (3) years, school districts or municipalities that choose to employ school resource officers shall receive direct state support for costs associated with employing such officers at public middle and high schools. Districts or municipalities shall be reimbursed an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the cost of salaries and benefits for the qualifying positions. Funding will be provided for school resource officer positions established on or after July 1, 2018, provided that:

Each school resource officer shall be assigned to one school:

Schools with enrollments below one thousand twelve hundred (1,200) students shall require one school resource officer;

Schools with enrollments of one thousand twelve hundred (1,200) or more students shall require two school resource officers;

School resource officers hired in excess of the requirement noted above shall not be eligible for reimbursement; and

Schools that eliminate existing school resource officer positions and create new positions under this provision shall not be eligible for reimbursement; and

Categorical programs defined in subsections (a) through (g) shall be funded pursuant to the transition plan in §

16-7.2-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 4; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 12, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 11, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 9, § 2.

16-7.2-7.
Transition plan.

The general assembly shall annually determine the appropriation of education aid pursuant to this chapter using a transition plan to begin in fiscal year 2012, not to exceed seven (7) years for LEA’s for whom the calculated education aid pursuant to §

16-7.2-3

is more than the education aid the LEA is receiving as of the effective date of the formula, and ten (10) years for LEA’s for whom the calculated education aid pursuant to §

16-7.2-3

is less than the education aid the LEA is receiving as of the effective date of the formula.

The local share of funding pursuant to §

16-7.2-5

shall be transitioned proportionately over a period not to exceed five (5) years. The transition shall provide a combination of direct aid to districts, funds for the categorical programs, and district savings through state-assumed costs, as determined by the general assembly on an annual basis. Updates to any components of the permanent foundation education aid formula, such as student data, property values, and/or median family income, that result in an increase or decrease in state education aid that impacts the total state and local contribution by more than three percent (3%) shall be transitioned over a period of time not to exceed three (3) years.

For districts that are converting from a half-day to a full-day kindergarten program for the 2014-2015 school year and after, as defined by §

16-99-4

, the increase in aid provided pursuant to the formula for the increased reference average daily membership due to the conversion of the kindergarten students from 0.5 full-time equivalent to 1.0 full-time equivalent is not subject to the transition plan in subsection (a); instead, the increased kindergarten full-time equivalents will be funded at the fully transitioned value of the formula beginning in FY 2017.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 4; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 23; P.L. 2014, ch. 431, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 456, § 2.

16-7.2-8.
Accountability.

Pursuant to §§

16-7.1-3

and

16-7.1-5

, the department of elementary and secondary education (the “department”) shall use the uniform chart of accounts to maintain fiscal accountability for education expenditures that comply with applicable laws and regulations including, but not limited to, the basic education program. This data shall be used to develop criteria, priorities, and benchmarks specific to each local education agency (LEA) to improve cost controls, efficiencies, and program effectiveness. The department shall present LEA-specific information to the LEA to which it applies, and provide a summary of all LEA reports to the governor and the general assembly annually, beginning on August 1, 2022.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall establish and/or implement program standards to be used in the oversight of the use of foundation aid calculated pursuant to §

16-7.2-3

. Such oversight will be carried out in accordance with the progressive support and intervention protocols established in chapter 7.1 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 4; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 10, § 2, effective July 6, 2021.

16-7.2-9.
Applicability.

This chapter applies to education aid for any city, town or regional school district including the Central Falls state operated school district, charter schools, the William M. Davies, Jr. Career and Technical High School, and the Metropolitan Regional Career and Technical Center. Calculation and distribution of aid under §§

16-7-20.5

,

16-7.1-6

,

16-7.1-8

,

16-7.1-9

,

16-7.1-10

,

16-7.1-11

,

16-7.1-11.1

,

16-7.1-12

,

16-7.1-15

,

16-7.1-16

,

16-7.1-17

,

16-7.1-18

,

16-7.1-19

,

16-67-4

, and

16-77.1-2

is hereby suspended effective July 1, 2011, until further action by the general assembly. Aid under this chapter will be paid pursuant to §

16-7-17

, except that aid to the Central Falls state operated school district and charter schools, Davies, and the Met Center pursuant to §

16-7.2-5

shall be paid in twelve (12) equal installments on the first of each month.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 4.

16-7.2-10.
Reporting to the General Assembly.

On or before November 15, 2010, the department of education shall report to the senate president, speaker of the house, and chairs of the Senate and House Finance Committees on the following: (a) The identification and evaluative impact of alternative mechanisms to update or supplement the median family income factor relied upon in the EWAV variable utilized in the permanent education aid formula in accordance with this section; (b) An analysis of the feasibility, alternative financing mechanisms, and impact of the Central Falls Stabilization Fund pursuant to this section; and, (c) a multi-year analysis of the impact of the financing of charter schools and vocational schools, pursuant to this section, on local school districts.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 4.